Louisiana, session 2026, HB993.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 11:2213(10) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§2213. Definitions
The following words and phrases, as used in this Chapter, unless a different
meaning is plainly required by context, shall have the following meanings:
* * *
(10) "Earnable compensation" shall mean the full amount of compensation
earned by an employee for a given month, including supplemental pay paid by the
state of Louisiana, but shall not include overtime and shall not include any
nonrecurring lump-sum payment or ad hoc bonus, including but not limited to
recruitment incentives, hiring or signing bonuses, retention incentives or bonuses,
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1382 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 993
and any other one-time award not paid as part of the employee's regular recurring
salary.
* * *
Section 2. The provisions of this Act shall apply prospectively only to compensation
earned in pay periods ending on or after July 1, 2026.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.